Hawaii statutes.
§304A-1702 Graduate medical education
program. (a) There is created a graduate medical education program to be
administered by the medical education council in cooperation with the
department of health.

(b) All funding for the graduate medical
education program shall be nonlapsing.

(c) Program moneys shall only be expended if:

(1) Approved by the medical education council; and

(2) Used for graduate medical education in accordance
with sections 304A-1704 and 304A-1705. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2; am L 2015, c
106, §8]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next